Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.080

Promotion of equal opportunity and benefits.

In carrying out its duties, the commission may establish such relationships with local governments and private industry as may be needed to promote equal opportunity and benefits to Asian Pacific Americans in government, education, economic development, employment, and services.

[ 1995 c 67 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 8.]